Alaska statutes. Title 42. Public Utilities and Carriers and Energy Programs.
Article 3. Safety Regulations Governing Transportation of Passengers in Vehicles.

Sec. 42.30.110.
Escape doorway.

A person engaged in business in the state as a common carrier may not use in the transportation of passengers on land a bus or other closed vehicle unless it has at least one escape doorway other than at the main entrance.
The escape door shall be located at the rear of the vehicle or on the side opposite the regular entrance, and shall be kept and maintained in working order and free of obstacles without locks at all times when passengers are being carried.
AS

42.30.110

—

42.30.140

do not apply to vehicles now in use in the state on March 14, 1949.

History.

(§ 1 ch 35 SLA 1949)

Sec. 42.30.120.
Standing passengers.

Every passenger bus operating as a common carrier may transport standing passengers in numbers that do not endanger the safe operation of the bus. A passenger bus operating as a common carrier on a route exceeding 15 miles from the center of a municipality may not carry standing passengers greater than 25 percent of the rated seating capacity of the bus.

History.

(§ 2 ch 35 SLA 1949)

Sec. 42.30.130.
Enforcement.

The Department of Public Safety and every peace officer and municipal law enforcement agency shall enforce AS

42.30.110

—

42.30.140

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 35 SLA 1949)

Sec. 42.30.140.
Penalties.

A person who violates AS

42.30.110

—

42.30.140

, upon conviction, is punishable for each offense by a fine of not more than $300.

History.

(§ 4 ch 35 SLA 1949)